Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 15A Justice and Public Safety Cabinet
15A.065.
Department of Juvenile Justice — Powers and duties — Advisory board.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall be headed by a commissioner and shall develop and administer programs for:

Prevention of juvenile crime;

Identification of juveniles at risk of becoming status or public offenders and development of early intervention strategies for these children, and, except for adjudicated youth, participation in prevention programs shall be voluntary;

Providing educational information to law enforcement, prosecution, victims, defense attorneys, the courts, the educational community, and the public concerning juvenile crime, its prevention, detection, trial, punishment, and rehabilitation;

The operation of or contracting for the operation of postadjudication treatment facilities and services for children adjudicated delinquent or found guilty of public offenses or as youthful offenders;

The operation or contracting for the operation, and the encouragement of operation by others, including local governments, volunteer organizations, and the private sector, of programs to serve predelinquent and delinquent youth;

Utilizing outcome-based planning and evaluation of programs to ascertain which programs are most appropriate and effective in promoting the goals of this section;

Conducting research and comparative experiments to find the most effective means of:

Preventing delinquent behavior;

Identifying predelinquent youth;

Preventing predelinquent youth from becoming delinquent;

Assessing the needs of predelinquent and delinquent youth;

Providing an effective and efficient program designed to treat and correct the behavior of delinquent youth and youthful offenders;

Assessing the success of all programs of the department and those operated on behalf of the department and making recommendations for new programs, improvements in existing programs, or the modification, combination, or elimination of programs as indicated by the assessment and the research; and

Seeking funding from public and private sources for demonstration projects, normal operation of programs, and alterations of programs.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may contract, with or without reimbursement, with a city, county, or urban-county government, for the provision of probation, diversion, and related services by employees of the contracting local government.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may contract for the provision of services, treatment, or facilities which the department finds in the best interest of any child, or for which a similar service, treatment, or facility is either not provided by the department or not available because the service or facilities of the department are at their operating capacity and unable to accept new commitments. The department shall, after consultation with the Finance and Administration Cabinet, promulgate administrative regulations to govern at least the following aspects of this subsection:

Bidding process; and

Emergency acquisition process.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall develop programs to:

Ensure that youth in state-operated or contracted residential treatment programs have access to an ombudsman to whom they may report program problems or concerns;

Review all treatment programs, state-operated or contracted, for their quality and effectiveness; and

Provide mental health services to committed youth according to their needs.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall have an advisory board appointed by the Governor, which shall serve as the advisory group under the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974, Pub. L. No. 93-415, as amended, and which shall provide a formulation of and recommendations for meeting the requirements of this section not less than annually to the Governor, the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Interim Joint Committees on Judiciary and on Appropriations and Revenue of the Legislative Research Commission when the General Assembly is not in session, and the Judiciary and the Appropriations and Revenue Committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate when the General Assembly is in session. The advisory board shall develop program criteria for early juvenile intervention, diversion, and prevention projects, develop statewide priorities for funding, and make recommendations for allocation of funds to the Commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The advisory board shall review grant applications from local juvenile delinquency prevention councils and include in its annual report the activities of the councils. The advisory board shall meet not less than quarterly.

The advisory board shall be chaired by a private citizen member appointed by the Governor and shall serve a term of two (2) years and thereafter be elected by the board. The members of the board shall be appointed to staggered terms and thereafter to four (4) year terms. The membership of the advisory board shall consist of no fewer than fifteen (15) persons and no more than thirty-three (33) persons who have training, experience, or special knowledge concerning the prevention and treatment of juvenile delinquency or the administration of juvenile justice. A majority of the members shall not be full-time employees of any federal, state, or local government, and at least one-fifth (1/5) of the members shall be under the age of twenty-four (24) years at the time of appointment. On July 15, 2002, any pre-existing appointment of a member to the Juvenile Justice Advisory Board and the Juvenile Justice Advisory Committee shall be terminated unless that member has been re-appointed subsequent to January 1, 2002, in which case that member’s appointment shall continue without interruption. The membership of the board shall include the following:

Three (3) current or former participants in the juvenile justice system;

An employee of the Department of Juvenile Justice;

An employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

A person operating alternative detention programs;

An employee of the Department of Education;

An employee of the Department of Public Advocacy;

An employee of the Administrative Office of the Courts;

A representative from a private nonprofit organization with an interest in youth services;

A representative from a local juvenile delinquency prevention council;

A member of the Circuit Judges Association;

A member of the District Judges Association;

A member of the County Attorneys Association;

A member of the County Judge/Executives Association;

A person from the business community not associated with any other group listed in this paragraph;

A parent not associated with any other group listed in this paragraph;

A youth advocate not associated with any other group listed in this paragraph;

A victim of a crime committed by a person under the age of eighteen (18) not associated with any other group listed in this paragraph;

A local school district special education administrator not associated with any other group listed in this paragraph;

A peace officer not associated with any other group listed in this paragraph; and

A college or university professor specializing in law, criminology, corrections, psychology, or similar discipline with an interest in juvenile corrections programs.

Failure of any member to attend three (3) meetings within a calendar year shall be deemed a resignation from the board. The board chair shall notify the Governor of any vacancy and submit recommendations for appointment.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall, in cooperation with the Department of Public Advocacy, develop a program of legal services for juveniles committed to the department who are placed in state-operated residential treatment facilities and juveniles in the physical custody of the department who are detained in a state-operated detention facility, who have legal claims related to the conditions of their confinement involving violations of federal or state statutory or constitutional rights. This system may utilize technology to supplement personal contact. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate an administrative regulation to govern at least the following aspects of this subsection:

Facility access;

Scheduling; and

Access to residents” records.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may, if space is available and conditioned upon the department’s ability to regain that space as needed, contract with another state or federal agency to provide services to youth of that agency.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 70, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 538, § 4, effective April 13, 1998; 2002, ch. 59, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 263, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 85, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 44, effective March 23, 2007; 2017 ch. 167, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

15A.0651.
Access to juvenile facility records — When permitted — Appeal of denial.

As used in this section, “juvenile facility” means any facility wherein a juvenile or other person under the authority of the Department of Juvenile Justice is confined.

KRS

61.870

to

61.884

to the contrary notwithstanding, a person shall not have access to a record if its disclosure is deemed by the commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice or his or her designee to constitute a threat to the security of the juvenile, the juvenile facility, or any other person.

KRS

61.870

to

61.884

to the contrary notwithstanding, the department shall not be required to comply with a request for any record from any person confined in a juvenile facility or any individual on active supervision under the jurisdiction of the department, unless the request is for a record that contains a specific reference to the individual making the request.

KRS

61.870

to

61.884

to the contrary notwithstanding, if a person confined in a juvenile facility wishes to challenge a denial of a request to inspect a public record, he or she shall mail or otherwise send the appropriate documents to the Attorney General within twenty (20) days of the denial pursuant to the procedures set out in KRS 61.880(2) before an appeal can be filed in a Circuit Court.

KRS

61.870

to

61.884

to the contrary notwithstanding, all records relating to juvenile detention containing information expunged pursuant to law shall not be open to the public.

KRS

61.870

to

61.884

to the contrary notwithstanding, upon receipt of a request for a record, the department shall respond to the request within five (5) days after receipt of the request, excepting Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, and shall state whether the record may be inspected or may not be inspected, or that the record is unavailable and when the record is expected to be available.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the department to deny any attorney representing a juvenile access to any record to which the attorney or the juvenile would otherwise be entitled.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

15A.0652.
Juvenile justice administrative regulations.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate administrative regulations that shall include:

Development or adoption of a validated risk and needs assessment that:

Considers factors such as the severity of the current offense, the child’s previous public offense record, and the child’s assessed criminal risk factors;

Is administered for all children adjudicated on a public offense prior to disposition and at regular intervals thereafter to determine risk levels and to identify intervention needs; and

Is implemented based on policies and practices for utilization of the assessment instrument to objectively guide placement and the length and type of treatment for each child committed to the department or probated to the department or other entity;

The provision of treatment for committed and probated children in accordance with evidence-based practices, including, at a minimum:

Development of a case plan for each child committed to the department or probated to the department that targets the risk factors identified in the assessment, is responsive to individual characteristics, involves the family as appropriate, provides supervision or monitoring of children according to their case plan, and establishes a treatment plan in accordance with subsection (3) of this section; and

Development and implementation of a graduated sanctions protocol of swift, certain, proportionate, and graduated sanctions that a probation officer or employee of the department shall apply in response to a child’s violations of the terms or conditions of probation. The graduated sanctions protocol shall:

Include a continuum of sanctions that take into account factors such as the severity of the current violation, the child’s previous criminal record, the number and severity of any previous probation violations, the child’s assessed risk level, and the extent to which graduated sanctions were imposed for previous violations. The system shall also define positive reinforcements that the probated child may receive for compliance with his or her terms or conditions of probation. A sanction of up to thirty (30) days’ out-of-home placement may be imposed for a violation of the terms of probation. A child shall not be committed or recommitted to the Department of Juvenile Justice for the violation of the conditions of probation;

Provide that judicial review for a probated youth, or an administrative hearing for a committed youth, shall not be necessary to impose graduated sanctions less than out-of-home placement; and

Require that less-restrictive graduated sanctions be utilized prior to requesting judicial review unless there is clear and convincing evidence that there are no graduated sanctions available that are appropriate for the child and the child is an immediate threat to himself, herself, or others;

Development and implementation of treatment plans for committed and probated children that:

Take into consideration the severity of the current offense and the child’s assessed risk and needs as identified by a validated risk and needs assessment;

Involve the family in the treatment plan as appropriate;

Allow a child to complete treatment in the community if resources are available rather than in a secure or nonsecure facility; and

For committed children may include:

A maximum of four (4) months of out-of-home placement if the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, other than a violation of KRS Chapter 510 or an offense involving a deadly weapon;

A maximum of eight (8) months of out-of-home placement if the child was adjudicated for an offense that would be a Class D felony if committed by an adult, other than a violation of KRS Chapter 510 or an offense involving a deadly weapon; and

A provision that if a child has reached the maximum time allowed in out-of-home placement, as specified in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph and further out-of-home placement is determined to be necessary for completion of treatment, the child may be held for an additional period only upon approval of the Administrative Transfer Request Committee, or another appropriate entity within the department as designated by the commissioner of the department after review of the facts and circumstances warranting the need for continued out-of-home placement. If the commissioner approves continued out-of-home placement, the maximum time the placement may be continued is the maximum originally allowed under subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph and the total period of commitment shall not exceed that permitted under KRS

635.060

;

Development and implementation of professional development programs for department staff who interact with or who are responsible for the treatment, supervision, or placement of children, that includes training on juvenile justice research relating to effectiveness of juvenile justice interventions, impacts of out-of-home placement, alternatives to incarceration, use of graduated sanctions, case planning, administration of a validated risk and needs assessment, and training to address specific issues such as domestic violence, trauma, and family engagement;

Development of procedures for measuring the outcomes of each treatment and intervention program and practice to demonstrate that the program or practice has a documented evidence base and has been evaluated for effectiveness in reducing recidivism for the children it serves, including:

A process for reviewing the objective criteria for evidence-based programs and practices established by the agency providing the program;

A process for auditing the effectiveness of the programs; and

An opportunity for programs that do not meet the criteria based on the audit results to develop and implement a corrective action plan within one hundred eighty (180) days of the audit;

Development of procedures to track juvenile recidivism, which shall include adjudication of a new public offense or conviction of a crime within three (3) years of release from an out-of-home placement or release from commitment, and collaboration with the Department of Corrections and the Administrative Office of the Courts to obtain adult conviction and incarceration information to enable collection of recidivism data;

Development of procedures to track the pre-adjudication and post-adjudication admissions beginning no later than August 1, 2014; and

Development of procedures to ensure maximum utilization of available federal funding resources which may be available to the agency.

As used in this section, “evidence-based practices,” “graduated sanction,” “out-of-home placement,” and “risk and needs assessment” have the same meanings as in KRS

600.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 5, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/14). In subsection (3)(d)3. of this statute, the Reviser of Statutes has changed the words “paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection” to read “subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph.” In an early version of the bill that created this statute (2014 Ky. Acts ch. 132, sec. 5), the phrase “paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection” was used in reference to language corresponding to the present subparagraphs 1. and 2. When the bill was redrafted before its final passage, the numbering of the paragraphs was changed, but the reference was inadvertently left unchanged. The Reviser of Statutes has made this correction under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).

15A.0653.
Liability insurance for health care professionals employed by or serving department — Authority of commissioner to purchase.

The commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice may, with the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, purchase liability insurance for the protection of health care professionals employed by or serving the department to protect them from liability for acts and claims of medical and professional malpractice arising in the course and scope of their employment or service to the department.

The commissioner may purchase the type and amount of liability coverage deemed appropriate to best serve the department’s interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 443, § 9, effective July 15, 1998.

15A.0654.
Earmarking of juvenile justice funding for evidence-based practices.

Beginning July 1, 2016, fifty percent (50%) of state moneys expended by the department on programs shall be for programs that are in accordance with evidence-based practices.

Beginning July 1, 2018, and thereafter, seventy-five percent (75%) of state moneys expended by the department on programs shall be for programs that are in accordance with evidence-based practices.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 4, effective July 15, 2014.

15A.066.
Department of Juvenile Justice employee not required to give personal attendance in out-of-county civil suit — Exception for necessary witness.

No employee of the Department of Juvenile Justice shall be required to give personal attendance as a witness in any civil suit arising out of or related to his or her employment, out of the county of that employee’s assigned work station, but his or her deposition shall be taken in lieu thereof; however, if the court in which the civil action is pending finds that the witness is a necessary witness for trial, that court may order the personal attendance of the witness at trial.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 263, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

15A.067.
Division of Program Services — Access to educational records — Screening and education of incarcerated youth — Information on educational status and need.

As used in this section, “facility” means any of the facilities specified in KRS

15A.200

operated by a political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and juvenile detention facilities operated by the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the care of juveniles alleged to be delinquent or adjudicated delinquent.

There is established within the department a Division of Program Services that shall be responsible for ensuring the delivery of appropriate educational programs to incarcerated youth. Each facility shall provide educational services to youth ordered by the court to remain in the juvenile detention facility.

Any other statutes to the contrary notwithstanding, the department shall have access to all educational records, public or private, of any juvenile in a facility or program or informal adjustment authorized by law.

The Division of Program Services shall ensure that all incarcerated youth be provided appropriate screening and educational programs as follows:

For students identified before incarceration as having an educational disability, the Division of Program Services shall make specially designed instruction and related services available as required by Kentucky Board of Education administrative regulations applicable to students with disabilities.

For students incarcerated for more than fourteen (14) days, the division shall ensure that appropriate screening is provided to all youth. Screening shall include but not be limited to seeking the juvenile’s educational record.

For students incarcerated for more than thirty (30) days, the division shall ensure that all youth are provided an appropriate education.

The department shall be responsible for providing, in its contracts with non-state-operated juvenile detention facilities, the specific obligations of those entities to provide educational services to incarcerated juveniles consistent with this section, including funding provisions.

The Department of Education and all local school district administrators shall cooperate with officials responsible for the operation of juvenile detention facilities and with the Division of Program Services to ensure that all documents necessary to establish educational status and need shall follow the students who are being held in these facilities so the students can be afforded educational opportunities.

Upon disposition by the juvenile court that an adjudicated juvenile shall stay in a juvenile detention facility for any period of time, the facility shall notify the juvenile’s last resident school district of the student’s whereabouts.

Within five (5) days after the juvenile is released, the Division of Program Services shall notify the district in which the student will reside of the youth’s release and educational status and forward any educational records.

The department shall, after consultation with the Department of Education, promulgate an administrative regulation for the effective implementation of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 64, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 606, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 8, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 534, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 64, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 257, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 132, § 7, effective July 15, 2014.

15A.068.
Duties of department if child may be victim of human trafficking — Administrative regulations.

If, during the course of screening, assessing, or providing services to a child committed to or in the custody of the department, there is reasonable cause to believe that the child is a victim of human trafficking as defined in KRS

529.010

, the department shall:

File a report with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services pursuant to KRS

620.030

;

Notify the child’s attorney that the child may be a victim of human trafficking; and

If the child does not pose a threat to public safety, petition the court to transfer custody from the department to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

After consultation with agencies serving victims of human trafficking, the department shall promulgate administrative regulations for the treatment of child victims of human trafficking who are committed to or in the custody of the department and pose a threat to public safety but do not qualify to be in the custody of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under subsection (1)(c) of this section. The administrative regulations shall include provisions for appropriate screening, assessment, placement, treatment, and services for these children, the training of staff, and collaboration with service providers.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 25, § 4, effective June 25, 2013.

15A.069.
Division of Placement Services — Duties — Reinvestment of juvenile justice facilities’ savings.

There is established within the department a Division of Placement Services that shall be responsible:

For the management, policy direction, and coordination of all matters relating to the classification, evaluation, and placement of juveniles committed to or detained by the department;

For the transportation of juveniles committed to or detained by the department;

If the division places a juvenile in a county other than the county of adjudication or sentencing, for notifying a department caseworker in the county of placement of this fact; and

For notifying the District Court in the county of placement of the juvenile’s complete offense record.

Any savings achieved by the Department of Juvenile Justice as a result of a reduction in the population in Department of Juvenile Justice facilities shall be reinvested as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) of all savings shall be reinvested into Department of Juvenile Justice community supervision and aftercare services;

Twenty-five percent (25%) shall be reinvested in day treatment centers; and

Twenty-five percent (25%) shall be reinvested in the fiscal incentive program established in KRS

15A.062

.

The oversight council established in KRS

15A.063

may recommend to the General Assembly modifications to the allocation of funds under this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 6, effective July 15, 2014.

15A.070.
Duties and powers of Department of Criminal Justice Training — Course instruction — Administrative regulations — Qualification as independent study.

The Department of Criminal Justice Training shall:

Establish, supervise, and coordinate training programs and schools for law enforcement personnel, subject to the limitations of KRS 15.440(1)(d) and (e) and

15.560

, and any other justice or nonlaw-enforcement-related personnel as prescribed by the secretary; and

Promulgate an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A by September 1, 2022, to establish procedures and participation requirements for basic training and annual in-service course instruction to be offered electronically and online through remote learning. The administrative regulation shall include the following provisions:

By no later than January 1, 2024, at least ten percent (10%) of the total hours of course instruction required to be completed for basic training under KRS 15.440(1)(d) be made available electronically and online for candidates to complete through remote learning;

By no later than January 1, 2025, at least thirty percent (30%) of the total course instruction required to be completed by an officer for annual in-service training under KRS 15.440(1)(e) that is offered or sponsored by the Department of Criminal Justice Training be made available electronically and online to complete through remote learning;

The instruction provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training under this paragraph shall not be in subject areas that require the demonstration or use of physical skill for the purposes of evaluating the participant’s proficiency;

The course offerings and instruction required to be provided under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph be available throughout the entire calendar year and spread over a reasonable period of time so as not to require attendance or participation for the entirety of a single work week; and

Any other reasonable procedures and rules to ensure the attendance, active participation, and successful mastery of the subject matters presented in the courses it provides electronically and online through remote learning under this paragraph are established.

The Department of Criminal Justice Training shall make a continuing study of law enforcement training standards and upon request may furnish information relating to standards for recruitment, employment, promotion, organization, management, and operation of any law enforcement agency in Kentucky.

The Department of Criminal Justice Training shall conduct continuing research on criminal law and criminal justice subjects related to law enforcement training.

The Department of Criminal Justice Training may by administrative regulation provide for administrative hearings to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

Nothing in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be interpreted to be an independent study as defined in 38 C.F.R. sec. 21.4267.

In order to ensure that a qualified trainee shall receive all Post-9/11 GI Bill benefits, or any other similar federal benefits related to military service, to which the trainee is entitled to receive while participating in basic training provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training pursuant to KRS 15.440(1)(d), the following shall apply in the event that the Kentucky Approving Agency for Veterans Education within the Kentucky Community and Technical College System classifies the training provided pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section as independent study as defined in 38 C.F.R. sec. 21.4267:

The Kentucky Approving Agency for Veterans Education shall seek a formal opinion of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs regarding its decision to classify the program as independent study;

If the United States Department of Veterans Affairs will not issue a formal opinion or determines or otherwise agrees that the program qualifies as independent study under federal regulations, the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall make available in-person course instruction to those who receive Post-9/11 GI Bill benefits, or any other similar federal benefits related to military service, as long as this offering meets criteria established under federal laws and regulations, provided that the Department of Criminal Justice Training and Kentucky Approving Agency for Veterans Education seeks a formal opinion of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs regarding any criteria that is relied upon to attempt to disqualify the agency;

If the Department of Criminal Justice Training cannot provide in-person instruction as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph because of a final determination that the trainee would be disqualified from receiving benefits during his or her participation in the program, the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall cause to be paid to the trainee an amount equal to the benefits the trainee would have received under the Post-9/11 GI Bill benefits or any other similar federal benefits related to military service had the program or instruction not been disqualified. The amount shall be paid to the trainee from the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund under KRS

15.430

; and

In the event that insufficient funds exist in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund established pursuant to KRS

15.430

to meet the obligations provided in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph, the law enforcement agency employing the trainee shall cause to be paid to the trainee an amount equal to the benefits the trainee would have received under the Post-9/11 GI Bill benefits or any other similar federal benefits related to military service had the program or instruction not been disqualified.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 8; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 4, effective July 1, 1977; 1978, ch. 155, § 15, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 343, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 64, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 318, § 17, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 480, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2016 ch. 112, § 10, effective July 15, 2016; 2022 ch. 91, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

15A.072.
Transfer of Department of Criminal Justice Training contract employees.

Effective May 1, 2017, contract employees of Eastern Kentucky University who are engaged in providing instructional and support services to the mission of the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall be transferred to the Department of Criminal Justice Training within the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet along with the funding associated with those employees. The Personnel Cabinet shall assist in implementing the transfer of employees.

Employees transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall retain the following:

All salaries and leave time balances accumulated as of the transfer date;

The date of initial contract employment with the Eastern Kentucky University for purposes of determining leave time accumulation; and

The date of initial participation in a state-administered retirement system if the employee has participated or is participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System for the purpose of calculating retirement benefits. However, nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to provide additional service credit for an employee prior to the transfer date other than what has already been credited to the appropriate retirement system, and any months of service accrued while employed by Eastern Kentucky University shall not count towards classified or unclassified service as defined in KRS

18A.005

.

As of May 1, 2017, employees transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall participate in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System as nonhazardous members pursuant to KRS

61.510

to

61.705

.

Employees transferred to the Department of Criminal Justice Training pursuant to this section shall be eligible to participate in the state-sponsored life and health insurance benefit programs administered by the Personnel Cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 18A. Employees shall be eligible for coverage under the life and health insurance programs effective May 1, 2017, and shall not be subject to any waiting period that may be otherwise applicable to participation in these programs.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 58, § 1, effective March 21, 2017.

15A.075.
Criminal Justice Council — Membership — Duties — Administrative support.

The Criminal Justice Council is hereby created within the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

The council shall undertake such research and other activities as may be authorized or directed by:

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet; or

The General Assembly.

The membership of the council shall consist of:

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, ex officio;

The Attorney General or his or her designee;

The chair of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives, nonvoting ex officio;

The chair of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate, nonvoting ex officio;

The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, ex officio;

The public advocate, ex officio;

The president of the Kentucky Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, ex officio;

The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections, ex officio;

The commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice, ex officio;and

Six (6) at-large members appointed by the Governor, as follows:

One (1) District Judge and one (1) Circuit Judge nominated by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court;

One (1) member representing law enforcement;

One (1) member of the County Attorneys” Association;

One (1) member of the Commonwealth Attorneys” Association; and

One (1) member representing community-based organizations, whether for-profit or nonprofit, with experience in programs such as substance abuse prevention and treatment, case management, mental health, or counseling.

The chairs of the House and Senate Judiciary Committees shall serve as co-chairs.

At-large members shall be appointed by August 1, 2017, and shall serve a term of two (2) years, and may be reappointed.

Each ex officio member, except for legislative members, may designate a proxy by written notice to the council prior to call of order of each meeting, and the proxy shall be entitled to participate as a full voting member.

Each member of the council shall have one (1) vote. Members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for their expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. The council shall meet at least quarterly. Meetings shall be held at the call of the chair, or upon the written request of two (2) members to the chair.

A simple majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of business at a meeting.

The council is authorized to establish committees and appoint additional persons who may not be members of the council, as necessary to effectuate its purposes.

The council’s administrative functions shall be performed by the executive director of the Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services, appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet and supported by the administrative, clerical, and other staff as allowed by budgetary limitations and as needed to fulfill the council’s role and mission and to coordinate its activities.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 85, § 37, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 75, § 13, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 158, § 98, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 37, proposed to create this section relating to the Criminal Justice Council within the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet as a new section of KRS Chapter 15. However, since KRS Chapter 15 relates to the Department of Law and KRS Chapter 15A relates to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(a), the Reviser of Statutes in codification has placed this section in KRS Chapter 15A rather than KRS Chapter 15.